tools/nvda/louis/tables/ko-g2-rules.cti
# Common letter contraction:
# Due to special rules with numbers, the rest of the chars are reproduced here.
noback always 가 1246
always 각 1246-1
always 갂 1246-1-1
always 갃 1246-1-3
always 간 1246-25
always 갅 1246-25-13
always 갆 1246-25-356
always 갇 1246-35
always 갈 1246-2
always 갉 1246-2-1
always 갊 1246-2-26
always 갋 1246-2-12
always 갌 1246-2-3
always 갍 1246-2-236
always 갎 1246-2-256
always 갏 1246-2-356
always 감 1246-26
always 갑 1246-12
always 값 1246-12-3
always 갓 1246-3
always 갔 1246-34
always 강 1246-2356
always 갖 1246-13
always 갗 1246-23
always 갘 1246-235
always 같 1246-236
always 갚 1246-256
always 갛 1246-356
always 걱 4-1456
always 걲 4-1456-1
always 걳 4-1456-3
always 건 4-23456
always 걵 4-23456-13
always 걶 4-23456-356
always 걸 4-2345
always 걹 4-2345-1
always 걺 4-2345-26
always 걻 4-2345-12
always 걼 4-2345-3
always 걽 4-2345-236
always 걾 4-2345-256
always 걿 4-2345-356
always 것 456-234
always 겄 456-234-3
always 견 4-16
always 겭 4-16-13
always 겮 4-16-356
always 결 4-1256
always 겱 4-1256-1
always 겲 4-1256-26
always 겳 4-1256-12
always 겴 4-1256-3
always 겵 4-1256-236
always 겶 4-1256-256
always 겷 4-1256-356
always 경 4-12456
always 곡 4-1346
always 곢 4-1346-1
always 곣 4-1346-3
always 곤 4-12356
always 곥 4-12356-13
always 곦 4-12356-356
always 공 4-123456
always 군 4-1245
always 굱 4-1245-13
always 굲 4-1245-356
always 굴 4-12346
always 굵 4-12346-1
always 굶 4-12346-26
always 굷 4-12346-12
always 굸 4-12346-3
always 굹 4-12346-236
always 굺 4-12346-256
always 굻 4-12346-356
always 근 4-1356
always 귽 4-1356-13
always 귾 4-1356-356
always 글 4-2346
always 긁 4-2346-1
always 긂 4-2346-26
always 긃 4-2346-12
always 긄 4-2346-3
always 긅 4-2346-236
always 긆 4-2346-256
always 긇 4-2346-356
always 긴 4-12345
always 긵 4-12345-13
always 긶 4-12345-356
always 까 6-1246
always 깍 6-1246-1
always 깎 6-1246-1-1
always 깏 6-1246-1-3
always 깐 6-1246-25
always 깑 6-1246-25-13
always 깒 6-1246-25-356
always 깓 6-1246-35
always 깔 6-1246-2
always 깕 6-1246-2-1
always 깖 6-1246-2-26
always 깗 6-1246-2-12
always 깘 6-1246-2-3
always 깙 6-1246-2-236
always 깚 6-1246-2-256
always 깛 6-1246-2-356
always 깜 6-1246-26
always 깝 6-1246-12
always 깞 6-1246-12-3
always 깟 6-1246-3
always 깠 6-1246-34
always 깡 6-1246-2356
always 깢 6-1246-13
always 깣 6-1246-23
always 깤 6-1246-235
always 깥 6-1246-236
always 깦 6-1246-256
always 깧 6-1246-356
always 꺽 6-4-1456
always 꺾 6-4-1456-1
always 꺿 6-4-1456-3
always 껀 6-4-23456
always 껁 6-4-23456-13
always 껂 6-4-23456-356
always 껄 6-4-2345
always 껅 6-4-2345-1
always 껆 6-4-2345-26
always 껇 6-4-2345-12
always 껈 6-4-2345-3
always 껉 6-4-2345-236
always 껊 6-4-2345-256
always 껋 6-4-2345-356
always 껏 6-456-234
always 껐 6-456-234-3
always 껸 6-4-16
always 껹 6-4-16-13
always 껺 6-4-16-356
always 껼 6-4-1256
always 껽 6-4-1256-1
always 껾 6-4-1256-26
always 껿 6-4-1256-12
always 꼀 6-4-1256-3
always 꼁 6-4-1256-236
always 꼂 6-4-1256-256
always 꼃 6-4-1256-356
always 꼉 6-4-12456
always 꼭 6-4-1346
always 꼮 6-4-1346-1
always 꼯 6-4-1346-3
always 꼰 6-4-12356
always 꼱 6-4-12356-13
always 꼲 6-4-12356-356
always 꽁 6-4-123456
always 꾼 6-4-1245
always 꾽 6-4-1245-13
always 꾾 6-4-1245-356
always 꿀 6-4-12346
always 꿁 6-4-12346-1
always 꿂 6-4-12346-26
always 꿃 6-4-12346-12
always 꿄 6-4-12346-3
always 꿅 6-4-12346-236
always 꿆 6-4-12346-256
always 꿇 6-4-12346-356
always 끈 6-4-1356
always 끉 6-4-1356-13
always 끊 6-4-1356-356
always 끌 6-4-2346
always 끍 6-4-2346-1
always 끎 6-4-2346-26
always 끏 6-4-2346-12
always 끐 6-4-2346-3
always 끑 6-4-2346-236
always 끒 6-4-2346-256
always 끓 6-4-2346-356
always 낀 6-4-12345
always 낁 6-4-12345-13
always 낂 6-4-12345-356
noback always 나 14
always 낙 14-1
always 낚 14-1-1
always 낛 14-1-3
always 난 14-25
always 낝 14-25-13
always 낞 14-25-356
always 낟 14-35
always 날 14-2
always 낡 14-2-1
always 낢 14-2-26
always 낣 14-2-12
always 낤 14-2-3
always 낥 14-2-236
always 낦 14-2-256
always 낧 14-2-356
always 남 14-26
always 납 14-12
always 낪 14-12-3
always 낫 14-3
always 났 14-34
always 낭 14-2356
always 낮 14-13
always 낯 14-23
always 낰 14-235
always 낱 14-236
always 낲 14-256
always 낳 14-356
always 넉 14-1456
always 넊 14-1456-1
always 넋 14-1456-3
always 넌 14-23456
always 넍 14-23456-13
always 넎 14-23456-356
always 널 14-2345
always 넑 14-2345-1
always 넒 14-2345-26
always 넓 14-2345-12
always 넔 14-2345-3
always 넕 14-2345-236
always 넖 14-2345-256
always 넗 14-2345-356
always 년 14-16
always 녅 14-16-13
always 녆 14-16-356
always 녈 14-1256
always 녉 14-1256-1
always 녊 14-1256-26
always 녋 14-1256-12
always 녌 14-1256-3
always 녍 14-1256-236
always 녎 14-1256-256
always 녏 14-1256-356
always 녕 14-12456
always 녹 14-1346
always 녺 14-1346-1
always 녻 14-1346-3
always 논 14-12356
always 녽 14-12356-13
always 녾 14-12356-356
always 농 14-123456
always 눈 14-1245
always 눉 14-1245-13
always 눊 14-1245-356
always 눌 14-12346
always 눍 14-12346-1
always 눎 14-12346-26
always 눏 14-12346-12
always 눐 14-12346-3
always 눑 14-12346-236
always 눒 14-12346-256
always 눓 14-12346-356
always 는 14-1356
always 늕 14-1356-13
always 늖 14-1356-356
always 늘 14-2346
always 늙 14-2346-1
always 늚 14-2346-26
always 늛 14-2346-12
always 늜 14-2346-3
always 늝 14-2346-236
always 늞 14-2346-256
always 늟 14-2346-356
always 닌 14-12345
always 닍 14-12345-13
always 닎 14-12345-356
noback always 다 24
always 닥 24-1
always 닦 24-1-1
always 닧 24-1-3
always 단 24-25
always 닩 24-25-13
always 닪 24-25-356
always 닫 24-35
always 달 24-2
always 닭 24-2-1
always 닮 24-2-26
always 닯 24-2-12
always 닰 24-2-3
always 닱 24-2-236
always 닲 24-2-256
always 닳 24-2-356
always 담 24-26
always 답 24-12
always 닶 24-12-3
always 닷 24-3
always 닸 24-34
always 당 24-2356
always 닺 24-13
always 닻 24-23
always 닼 24-235
always 닽 24-236
always 닾 24-256
always 닿 24-356
always 덕 24-1456
always 덖 24-1456-1
always 덗 24-1456-3
always 던 24-23456
always 덙 24-23456-13
always 덚 24-23456-356
always 덜 24-2345
always 덝 24-2345-1
always 덞 24-2345-26
always 덟 24-2345-12
always 덠 24-2345-3
always 덡 24-2345-236
always 덢 24-2345-256
always 덣 24-2345-356
always 뎐 24-16
always 뎑 24-16-13
always 뎒 24-16-356
always 뎔 24-1256
always 뎕 24-1256-1
always 뎖 24-1256-26
always 뎗 24-1256-12
always 뎘 24-1256-3
always 뎙 24-1256-236
always 뎚 24-1256-256
always 뎛 24-1256-356
always 뎡 24-12456
always 독 24-1346
always 돆 24-1346-1
always 돇 24-1346-3
always 돈 24-12356
always 돉 24-12356-13
always 돊 24-12356-356
always 동 24-123456
always 둔 24-1245
always 둕 24-1245-13
always 둖 24-1245-356
always 둘 24-12346
always 둙 24-12346-1
always 둚 24-12346-26
always 둛 24-12346-12
always 둜 24-12346-3
always 둝 24-12346-236
always 둞 24-12346-256
always 둟 24-12346-356
always 든 24-1356
always 듡 24-1356-13
always 듢 24-1356-356
always 들 24-2346
always 듥 24-2346-1
always 듦 24-2346-26
always 듧 24-2346-12
always 듨 24-2346-3
always 듩 24-2346-236
always 듪 24-2346-256
always 듫 24-2346-356
always 딘 24-12345
always 딙 24-12345-13
always 딚 24-12345-356
always 따 6-24
always 딱 6-24-1
always 딲 6-24-1-1
always 딳 6-24-1-3
always 딴 6-24-25
always 딵 6-24-25-13
always 딶 6-24-25-356
always 딷 6-24-35
always 딸 6-24-2
always 딹 6-24-2-1
always 딺 6-24-2-26
always 딻 6-24-2-12
always 딼 6-24-2-3
always 딽 6-24-2-236
always 딾 6-24-2-256
always 딿 6-24-2-356
always 땀 6-24-26
always 땁 6-24-12
always 땂 6-24-12-3
always 땃 6-24-3
always 땄 6-24-34
always 땅 6-24-2356
always 땆 6-24-13
always 땇 6-24-23
always 땈 6-24-235
always 땉 6-24-236
always 땊 6-24-256
always 땋 6-24-356
always 떡 6-24-1456
always 떢 6-24-1456-1
always 떣 6-24-1456-3
always 떤 6-24-23456
always 떥 6-24-23456-13
always 떦 6-24-23456-356
always 떨 6-24-2345
always 떩 6-24-2345-1
always 떪 6-24-2345-26
always 떫 6-24-2345-12
always 떬 6-24-2345-3
always 떭 6-24-2345-236
always 떮 6-24-2345-256
always 떯 6-24-2345-356
always 뗜 6-24-16
always 뗝 6-24-16-13
always 뗞 6-24-16-356
always 뗠 6-24-1256
always 뗡 6-24-1256-1
always 뗢 6-24-1256-26
always 뗣 6-24-1256-12
always 뗤 6-24-1256-3
always 뗥 6-24-1256-236
always 뗦 6-24-1256-256
always 뗧 6-24-1256-356
always 뗭 6-24-12456
always 똑 6-24-1346
always 똒 6-24-1346-1
always 똓 6-24-1346-3
always 똔 6-24-12356
always 똕 6-24-12356-13
always 똖 6-24-12356-356
always 똥 6-24-123456
always 뚠 6-24-1245
always 뚡 6-24-1245-13
always 뚢 6-24-1245-356
always 뚣 6-24-134-35
always 뚤 6-24-12346
always 뚥 6-24-12346-1
always 뚦 6-24-12346-26
always 뚧 6-24-12346-12
always 뚨 6-24-12346-3
always 뚩 6-24-12346-236
always 뚪 6-24-12346-256
always 뚫 6-24-12346-356
always 뜬 6-24-1356
always 뜭 6-24-1356-13
always 뜮 6-24-1356-356
always 뜰 6-24-2346
always 뜱 6-24-2346-1
always 뜲 6-24-2346-26
always 뜳 6-24-2346-12
always 뜴 6-24-2346-3
always 뜵 6-24-2346-236
always 뜶 6-24-2346-256
always 뜷 6-24-2346-356
always 띤 6-24-12345
always 띥 6-24-12345-13
always 띦 6-24-12345-356
always 럭 5-1456
always 럮 5-1456-1
always 럯 5-1456-3
always 런 5-23456
always 럱 5-23456-13
always 럲 5-23456-356
always 럴 5-2345
always 럵 5-2345-1
always 럶 5-2345-26
always 럷 5-2345-12
always 럸 5-2345-3
always 럹 5-2345-236
always 럺 5-2345-256
always 럻 5-2345-356
always 련 5-16
always 렩 5-16-13
always 렪 5-16-356
always 렬 5-1256
always 렭 5-1256-1
always 렮 5-1256-26
always 렯 5-1256-12
always 렰 5-1256-3
always 렱 5-1256-236
always 렲 5-1256-256
always 렳 5-1256-356
always 령 5-12456
always 록 5-1346
always 롞 5-1346-1
always 롟 5-1346-3
always 론 5-12356
always 롡 5-12356-13
always 롢 5-12356-356
always 롱 5-123456
always 룬 5-1245
always 룭 5-1245-13
always 룮 5-1245-356
always 룰 5-12346
always 룱 5-12346-1
always 룲 5-12346-26
always 룳 5-12346-12
always 룴 5-12346-3
always 룵 5-12346-236
always 룶 5-12346-256
always 룷 5-12346-356
always 른 5-1356
always 륹 5-1356-13
always 륺 5-1356-356
always 를 5-2346
always 륽 5-2346-1
always 륾 5-2346-26
always 륿 5-2346-12
always 릀 5-2346-3
always 릁 5-2346-236
always 릂 5-2346-256
always 릃 5-2346-356
always 린 5-12345
always 릱 5-12345-13
always 릲 5-12345-356
noback always 마 15
always 막 15-1
always 맊 15-1-1
always 맋 15-1-3
always 만 15-25
always 맍 15-25-13
always 많 15-25-356
always 맏 15-35
always 말 15-2
always 맑 15-2-1
always 맒 15-2-26
always 맓 15-2-12
always 맔 15-2-3
always 맕 15-2-236
always 맖 15-2-256
always 맗 15-2-356
always 맘 15-26
always 맙 15-12
always 맚 15-12-3
always 맛 15-3
always 맜 15-34
always 망 15-2356
always 맞 15-13
always 맟 15-23
always 맠 15-235
always 맡 15-236
always 맢 15-256
always 맣 15-356
always 먹 15-1456
always 먺 15-1456-1
always 먻 15-1456-3
always 먼 15-23456
always 먽 15-23456-13
always 먾 15-23456-356
always 멀 15-2345
always 멁 15-2345-1
always 멂 15-2345-26
always 멃 15-2345-12
always 멄 15-2345-3
always 멅 15-2345-236
always 멆 15-2345-256
always 멇 15-2345-356
always 면 15-16
always 멵 15-16-13
always 멶 15-16-356
always 멸 15-1256
always 멹 15-1256-1
always 멺 15-1256-26
always 멻 15-1256-12
always 멼 15-1256-3
always 멽 15-1256-236
always 멾 15-1256-256
always 멿 15-1256-356
always 명 15-12456
always 목 15-1346
always 몪 15-1346-1
always 몫 15-1346-3
always 몬 15-12356
always 몭 15-12356-13
always 몮 15-12356-356
always 몽 15-123456
always 문 15-1245
always 묹 15-1245-13
always 묺 15-1245-356
always 물 15-12346
always 묽 15-12346-1
always 묾 15-12346-26
always 묿 15-12346-12
always 뭀 15-12346-3
always 뭁 15-12346-236
always 뭂 15-12346-256
always 뭃 15-12346-356
always 믄 15-1356
always 믅 15-1356-13
always 믆 15-1356-356
always 믈 15-2346
always 믉 15-2346-1
always 믊 15-2346-26
always 믋 15-2346-12
always 믌 15-2346-3
always 믍 15-2346-236
always 믎 15-2346-256
always 믏 15-2346-356
always 민 15-12345
always 믽 15-12345-13
always 믾 15-12345-356
noback always 바 45
always 박 45-1
always 밖 45-1-1
always 밗 45-1-3
always 반 45-25
always 밙 45-25-13
always 밚 45-25-356
always 받 45-35
always 발 45-2
always 밝 45-2-1
always 밞 45-2-26
always 밟 45-2-12
always 밠 45-2-3
always 밡 45-2-236
always 밢 45-2-256
always 밣 45-2-356
always 밤 45-26
always 밥 45-12
always 밦 45-12-3
always 밧 45-3
always 밨 45-34
always 방 45-2356
always 밪 45-13
always 밫 45-23
always 밬 45-235
always 밭 45-236
always 밮 45-256
always 밯 45-356
always 벅 45-1456
always 벆 45-1456-1
always 벇 45-1456-3
always 번 45-23456
always 벉 45-23456-13
always 벊 45-23456-356
always 벌 45-2345
always 벍 45-2345-1
always 벎 45-2345-26
always 벏 45-2345-12
always 벐 45-2345-3
always 벑 45-2345-236
always 벒 45-2345-256
always 벓 45-2345-356
always 변 45-16
always 볁 45-16-13
always 볂 45-16-356
always 별 45-1256
always 볅 45-1256-1
always 볆 45-1256-26
